src/fst/phonology.twolc
! lexical side of consonants that participate in gradation
! LexGrad = G1 B1 D1 K1 P1 T1 S1 B2 K2 P2 T2 g b d k p t f s š ;

Definitions

WordBorder = [ .#. | # ];  ! word border
Border = [ WordBorder | %- | » ];   ! "noad-kahvlid" is 2 words; kildkond»liku = strong » weak grade
Gi = [ [ :g | :k ] i ] ;
WordEnd = [ [ %> Gi WordBorder ] | Border ];     ! final +gi is optional for almost any word

Null = [[ :0 | %> ] - Border];            ! something on the lexical side, but nothing on the surface 
Any  = [ : - Border ];             ! anything except word border
SuffixBorder = [%> | »];           ! for assimilation in verb paradigmatic derivation (tud, tamatu, tav): and+tud=antud  

! these trigger-aware contexts are used in a few rules; kind of ad hoc...
GradeTrigger = [ %{W%}: | %{S%}: ] ;

NullNoWeakTrigger = [[ Null - %{W%}: ] | » ];   
AnyNoWeakTrigger  = [[ Any  - %{W%}: ] | » ];   
NullNoTrigger = [ Null - GradeTrigger ] ;
AnyNoTrigger  = [ Any  - GradeTrigger ] ;

ShortSyll = [WordBorder | :Consonant] :Vowel ;  ! short syllable

Rules 
 
! -----
! general 
"strong and weak gradation triggers cannot co-exist"
%{S%}:0  /<= _ :* %{W%}: ;
             %{W%}: :* _ ;

! -----
! ----- stem grade alternation
! -----

! ----- consonant gradation

! different contexts for declinables and verbs
! (because declinables may have additional info in the stem lexicon entries)
! left context has to be sonorous because of orthographic conventions:
! gbd are written as kpt after voiceless consonants
! 
"Weak grade for productive kpt:gbd" 

Cx:Cy  <=> :Vowel :sonor _ Null*           :stemV %{W%}: ;  ! kaup-kauba, kurtma-kurdetud
           :Vowel :sonor _ Null* %{W%}: Null* :stemV     ;  ! paik - paigus
                  :sonor _ [l | r | j | v] :stemV %{W%}: ;  ! kõblata
           :Vowel :sonor _ 0:e [l | r]        e:0 %{W%}: ;  ! võidelda
     where Cx in ( p t k ) 
           Cy in ( b d g )
     matched ;

! lexical: k a u p > {pl.u} {sg.a} {W}
! surface: k a u b >    0      a    0
! lexical: k r a a p i {W} > n
! surface: k r a a b i  0  > n
! lexical: k a t k u {W} > n
! surface: k a t k u  0  0> n
! lexical: k õ p l a {W} > t a
! surface: k õ b l a  0  > t a
! lexical: v õ i t 0 l {W} > d a
! surface: v õ i d e l  0  > d a
! lexical: s i p 0 l e {W} > d a
! surface: s i p e l 0  0  > d a  ! no visible change
! lexical: l õ t v e {W}
! surface: l õ d v e  0        ! Sg Nom
! lexical: k u r t A7 0 {W} > T7 u d
! surface: k u r d  0 e  0  >  t u d


!!€ kraapi%{W%}>n
!!€ kraabi0>n

!!$ kraapi%{W%}>n
!!$ kraapi0>n


"Weak grade for productive kk pp tt šš ff : k p t š f"

Cx:0 <=>  :sonor _ Cx Null* :stemV (lmnr) %{W%}:  ;  ! sepa, lepin, aken, tütar, ...
     where Cx in ( p t k š f) ;

! lexical: k e p p > {pl.e} {sg.i} {W}
! surface: k e p 0 >    0      i    0 
! lexical: s e p p > {pl.i} {sg.a} {W}
! surface: s e p 0 >    0      a    0 
! lexical: l e p p i {W} > n
! surface: l e p 0 i  0  > n 
! lexical: t ü t t A2 r {W}
! surface: t ü t 0 a  r 0 

! ss is different from kk pp tt šš ff
! buss Sg Gen (weak grade) is bussi, not busi...

"Weak grade for productive ss:s kauss, jamss"

s:0 <=> :Vowel :sonor :s _ Null* :stemV %{W%}: ;

! lexical: k a u s s > {pl.e} {sg.i} {W}
! surface: k a u s 0 >    0      i    0
! lexical: m a r s s i {W} > n
! surface: m a r s 0 i  0  > n

"Lexically determined weak grade: prohibit the strong phones"

Cx:Cy /<= _ AnyNoTrigger* %{W%}: ;         
     where Cx in ( B2 G1 G1 K1 B1 B1 P1 D1 D1 T1 S1 K2 P2 T2) 
           Cy in (  b  g  k  k  b  p  p  d  t  t  s  k  p  t)
     matched ;

"Lexically determined weak grade: allow the weak phones"

Cx:Cy  => _ AnyNoTrigger* %{W%}: ;
     where Cx in ( B2 G1 K1 B1 P1 D1 T1 S1 K2 P2 T2) 
           Cy in (  v  0  0  0  0  0  0  0  g  b  d)
     matched ;

! lexical: k ä i B2 e {W}
! surface: k ä i v  e  0
! lexical: l a G1 {stemill} e {W}
! surface: l a  0     0     e  0
! lexical: t u B2 a {W}
! surface: t o  0 a  0
! lexical: l a u D1 > {pl.u} {sg.a} {W}
! surface: l a u  0 >    0      a    0
! lexical: p a a S1 > {pl.e} {sg.i} {W}
! surface: p a 0  0 >   0       e    0
! lexical: e r K2 A2 s {W}
! surface: e r  g  a s  0
! lexical: e r K2 A2 s > a
! surface: e r  k  0 s > a

"Word-final J1: makes sg nom weak grade"

Cx:Cy <=>  J1: _ NullNoTrigger* WordEnd ;         ! rohi ruhi rehi
           _ J1: NullNoTrigger* WordEnd ;         ! lubi lodi 
     where Cx in (T1 P2 T2) 
           Cy in ( 0  b  d)
     matched ;

! lexical: r o h J1 T1 > {pl.e} {rare} {sg.u} {W}
! surface: r o h  0  0 >    0      0      u    0
! lexical: l u P2 J1
! surface: l u  b  i 

"kpt:gbd; weak sg nom for ader etc"

Cx:Cy <=>  _ E2:e [l | r] NullNoTrigger* WordEnd ;  ! ader sg nom is not %{W%}:; has e2:e
      where Cx in ( K2 P2 T2 ) 
            Cy in (  g  b  d )
      matched ;

! lexical: a T2 E2 r > {pl.u} {rare}
! surface: a  d  e r >    0     0

"b d and s assimilation after lmnr"

Cx:Cy <=> ShortSyll Cy _ Null* :Vowel AnyNoTrigger* %{W%}: ;             ! also -kond -konna -konda
          ShortSyll Cy _ NullNoTrigger* %{W%}: NullNoTrigger* :Vowel ;   ! -konnis, -konnist etc.
     where Cx in (B1 D1 D1 D1 S1) 
           Cy in ( m  l  n  r  r)
     matched ;

! lexical: l a m B1 a s {W}
! surface: l a m  m a s  0
! lexical: k u l D1 {pl.u} {sg.a} {W}
! surface: k u l  l    0      a    0
! lexical: k a n D1 {pl.u} {sg.a} {W}
! surface: k a n  n    0      a    0
! lexical: k o r D1 {pl.u} {sg.a} {W}
! surface: k o r  r    0      a    0
! lexical: k õ r S1 e {W}
! surface: k õ r  r e  0
! lexical: k ä ä n D1 e {W}   !NB no assimilation !
! surface: k ä ä n  0 e  0

! ------- vowel lowering and shortening in grade alternation

! vowel lowering; 
! it is triggered by g b d t s disappearing (or morpheme border between i and i - the rule is in other place)

"single short high vowel lowers if it obtains a neighboring vowel after stop or s disappears"

Vx:Vy  <=>  ShortSyll (LowerBackVowel:0) WS:0 Null* _  ;
            [Border | Consonant] _ WS:0 :Vowel ;
       where Vx in ( i u ü %{sg.i%} %{sg.u%} )
             Vy in ( e o ö     e        o    )
       matched;

! lexical: v i G1 a
! surface: v e  0 a
! lexical: s ü S1 e {W}
! surface: s ö  0 e  0

! lexical: s a a G1 {W} > {sg.i}
! surface: s a 0  0  0  >    e
! lexical: v o o G1 > {pl.e} {sg.u} {W} 
! surface: v o 0  0 >    0      o    0
! lexical: l i u G1 > {pl.e} {sg.u} {W}    
! surface: l i 0  0 >    0      u    0    NB! no lowering!

! here long vowel shortening is formally equivalent to one vowel deletion
! hence the need to use several rules instead of one <=> rule:
! there are other contexts where a vowel gets deleted

"Long vowel shortening 1/2"

Vx:0 =>      Vx _ Null+ :stemV ;            ! puid, suid, soid, sae, soe, nea
         :Vowel _ Null+ :Vx ;               ! tõu, näub
            :Vx _ E4:e ;                    ! soe
      where Vx in ( Vowel ) ;  

"Long vowel shortening 2/2"

Vx:Vx /<=     Vx _ Null+ :i ;            ! puid, suid, soid
          :Vowel _ Null+ :Vx ;               ! tõu, näub
             :Vx _ E4:e ;                    ! soe
      where Vx in ( Vowel ) ;  

"Long high vowel does not shorten before a stem vowel , unless it is i"

Vx:0 /<=  :Vx _ Null+ [:stemV - :i];            ! riiu, luua; puid
      where Vx in ( HighVowel ) ;  

"Long non-high vowel shortens before a stem vowel"

Vx:Vx /<=  Vx _ Null+ :stemV ;            ! sae, soid
      where Vx in ( NonHighVowel ) ;  


! lexical: s a a G1 > {pl.e} {sg.i} {W}
! surface: s a 0  0 >    0      e    0 
! lexical: h u u G1 a {W} > n u d      
! surface: h u u  0 a  0  > n u d     NB! no shortening !

! lexical: p u u             {id} > {s} i d
! surface: p u 0               0  0  0  i d

! lexical: t õ u G1 > {pl.e} {sg.u} {W}
! surface: t õ 0  0 >    0      u    0
! lexical: n ä u G1 u {W} > b 
! surface: n ä 0  0 u  0  > b

!-----

! -----
! ----- stem ending changes
! -----

"nonstressed syllable vowel (a e u i) deletion"

Vx:Vy  <=>    _ Null* [:Consonant - :stop] Null* :stemV  ;
     where Vx in ( A2 I2 U2 E2 ) 
           Vy in (  0  0  0  0 )
     matched ;

! lexical: p e e n A2 r > a
! surface: p e e n  0 r > a 
! lexical: t ä h t I2 s > a
! surface: t ä h t  0 s > a 
! lexical: s u h k U2 r > u
! surface: s u h k  0 r > u 
! lexical: k o o r E2 m > a
! surface: k o o r 0  m > a 
! lexical: s e a d E2 m > e    ??
! surface: s e a d 0  m > e 
! lexical: a T2 E2 r > a
! surface: a  d  0 r > a 

! some older verbs lose the stem final vowel in strong grade forms
"verb stem final vowel in weak grade (excl. impersonal)"

Vx:Vy  <=> _ %{W%}: %> \[T7:] ;
     where Vx in ( A7 E7 ) 
           Vy in (  a  e )
     matched ;

! lexical: s e i s A7 {W} > b
! surface: s e i s  a  0  > b 
   
!--------- declinable word stem change ---------
! schwa (dis)appears or emerges or surfaces...
! REDEL type

! the -li/-ri form may be common or rare
" -el/-er is -li/-ri "

e:0 <=>  _ [l | r]           %{E%}:           SuffixBorder i: \%{rare%}: ;   ! toobri
         _ [l | r]           %{E%}: %{rare%}: SuffixBorder i:  %{rare%}: ;   ! gospli
         _ [l | r] %{rare%}: %{E%}:           SuffixBorder i: \%{rare%}: ;   ! piksli

! lexical: t o o b e r {E} > i
! surface: t o o b 0 r  0  > i
! lexical: g o s p e l {E} {rare} > i {rare}   gospli is rare; gospeli is common
! surface: g o s p 0 l  0     0   > i    0
! lexical: p i k s e l {rare} {E} > i \{rare}  piksli is common; pikseli is rare
! surface: p i k s 0 l    0    0  > i    0

! {E} has actually the semantics of 'delete the previous e' 
! in the stem lexicon,
! piksel{rare}{E} means that pikseli is rare, piksli is common
! gospel{E}{rare} means that gospeli is common, gospli is rare
! the last {rare} tag comes from a continuation lexicon

"usage tag is here and there"
%{rare%}:0  =>  _ %{E%}:    ;
                  %{E%}: _  ;
               SuffixBorder i: _ ;

! when concatenating the stem lexicon and variants of continuation classes,
! some paths end up containing unnecessary symbol {rare}; this rule 
! deletes the paths
 
"block a spurious path"
%{rare%}:0 /<= # \[%{rare%}:]* SuffixBorder i: _ ;


! --------- verb stem changes -------
! not really gradation
! if [l | r] does not border with a vowel, then schwa surfaces (or appears?)
! schwa surfaces either before or after [l | r]

! siplema-sipelda

"el-le 1/3"

e:0 <=> [:Consonant | WS:0] :e [l | r] _ %{W%}: SuffixBorder :Consonant ;

"el-le 2/3"

0:e <=>  [:Consonant | WS:0] _ [l | r] e:0 %{W%}: SuffixBorder :Consonant ;

! in weak grade, -le- is impossible (has to be -el-)
"el-le 3/3"

e:e /<=  [:Consonant | WS:0] [l | r] _ %{W%}: SuffixBorder :Consonant ;

! lexical: s i p 0 l e {W} > d a
! surface: s i p e l 0  0  > d a
! hüüdlema-hüüelda
! lexical: h ´ ü ü D1 0 l e {W} > d a
! surface: h ´ ü ü 0  e l 0  0  > d a

! --------- -ne, -s ending words
! xxx rules are needed for allowing -ne only for sg nom

"ne-stem shortening"
n:0  <=> :Consonant _ Null+ » %- ;        ! nais-, vaatamis-, astraal-
         :Consonant _ Null+ » # ;            ! vaatamistunne, astraaltunne ??? related to compounding somehow ???

! lexical: a s t r a a l n e E1 > -
! surface: a s t r a a l 0 0  0 > -

! we want to express correspondence: ne -> s in the context of E1, I1 or A1
"ne to s (1/2)"

n:s  =>       _ e: E1:  ;
              _ e: Null* (») I1: ;
              _ e: %> A1:  ;

"ne to s (2/2)"

e:0  /<= n:n _ E1: ;
         n:n _ %> A1: ;

"e disappearing (ne - s) 1/2"

e:0 <=>       n: _ E1: ;                    ! kodune - kodust, koduse
              n: _ Null* (») I1: ;          ! katkine - katkisil;  alalisim
              n: _ %> A1: ;                    ! pingne - pingsa

! we postulate that there is a special stem vowel e that is added both for -ne and -s words
"add e for inflecting a ne/s word "

E1:e   => n:s e:0 _ ;  ! -ne word
          s _ ;      ! -s word

! lexical: s o o l a n e E1
! surface: s o o l a s 0 e
! lexical: v i s k o o s n e E1 > t
! surface: v i s k o o s s 0 e  > t
